Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 16. Wharves, Docks, Piers and Bulkheads.

§ 62.1-164.
Erection and abatement of private wharves, piers and landings.

Any person owning land upon a watercourse may erect a private wharf on the same, or private pier or landing, in such watercourse opposite his land; provided, such wharf, pier or land is for noncommercial purposes and navigation be not obstructed, nor the private rights of any person be otherwise injured thereby. The circuit court of the county in which such wharf, pier or landing is, after causing ten days’ notice to be given to the owner thereof, of its intention to consider the subject, if it be satisfied that such wharf, pier or landing obstructs the navigation of the watercourse, or so encroaches on any private landing as to prevent the free use thereof, may abate the same.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-139; 1968, c. 659; 1972, c. 415.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Wharves, §§ 1, 3.

§ 62.1-165.
Erection of wharves at county landings.

Any person desiring the privilege of erecting a wharf at or on any county landing may, after giving notice of his intention by advertising such notice at some public place near the landing, and also at the front door of the courthouse of such county, on the first day of a term of the circuit court of the county, present to the court at its next term a petition for such privilege. The court may determine the same, and may, in its discretion, grant such privilege and fix such rates and charges upon such conditions and limitations as to it may seem fit. The court, at any subsequent term, may, if it think proper, revoke such privilege, or alter such conditions or limitations, or regulate the rates and charges. This section shall not be construed to authorize a circuit court of the county to grant the privilege of erecting a wharf within a city.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-140; 1968, c. 659.